Missouri, session 2026, HB3475.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 67.597, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 67.597, to read as follows:
67.597. 1. This section shall apply to the governing body of:
(1) A county with more than fifteen thousand seven hundred but fewer than seventeen
thousand six hundred inhabitants and with a county seat with more than four thousand two
hundred ten but fewer than six thousand inhabitants; and
(2) A county with more than nineteen thousand but fewer than twenty-two
thousand inhabitants and with a county seat with more than six thousand but fewer
than eight thousand five hundred inhabitants.
2. A governing body described in subsection 1 of this section may adopt an order
or ordinance imposing a sales tax on all retail sales made within the county that are subject to
sales tax under chapter 144. The rate of such tax shall not exceed one percent.
[2.] 3. Such tax shall not become effective unless the governing body of the county
submits to the voters of the county, on any date available for elections for the county, a
proposal to authorize the governing body of the county to impose such tax. Such tax shall be
in addition to all other taxes imposed by law. Such tax shall be stated separately from all
other charges and taxes. The proceeds of such tax shall be used by the county solely for the
support of the operations of hospital services in such county.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3475 2
[3.] 4. The ballot of submission for such tax shall be in substantially the following
form:
"Shall ______ (insert the county name) impose a sales tax at a
rate of _______ (insert percentage) percent for the support of the
operations of hospital services?".

If a majority of the votes cast on the question by the qualified voters voting thereon are in
favor of the question, such tax shall become effective on the first day of the second calendar
quarter following the calendar quarter in which the election was held. If a majority of the
votes cast on the question by the qualified voters voting thereon are opposed to the question,
such tax shall not become effective unless and until the question is resubmitted under this
section to the qualified voters of the county and such question is approved by a majority of
the qualified voters of the county voting on the question.
[4.] 5. Except as modified in this section, all provisions of sections 32.085 and 32.087
shall apply to the tax imposed under this section.
[5.] 6. All moneys collected under this section by the director of the department of
revenue on behalf of such county shall be deposited in a special trust fund, which is hereby
created and shall be known as the "County Hospital Operations Sales Tax Fund", except that
the director may deposit up to one percent for the cost of collection in the state's general
revenue fund. Moneys in the fund shall be used solely for the designated purposes. Moneys
in the fund shall not be deemed to be state moneys and shall not be commingled with any
moneys of the state. The director may make refunds from the amounts in the fund and
credited to the county for erroneous payments and overpayments made and may redeem
dishonored checks and drafts deposited to the credit of such county. Any moneys in the
special fund that are not needed for current expenditures shall be invested in the same manner
as other moneys are invested. Any interest and moneys earned on such investments shall be
credited to the fund.
[6.] 7. The governing body of a county that has adopted such tax may submit the
question of repeal of the tax to the voters on any date available for elections for the county. If
a majority of the votes cast on the question by the qualified voters voting thereon are in favor
of the repeal, the repeal shall become effective on December thirty-first of the calendar year
in which such repeal was approved. If a majority of the votes cast on the question by the
qualified voters voting thereon are opposed to the repeal, such tax shall remain effective until
the question is resubmitted under this section to the qualified voters and the repeal is
approved by a majority of the qualified voters voting on the question.
[7.] 8. Whenever the governing body of a county that has adopted such tax receives a
petition, signed by a number of registered voters of the county equal to at least ten percent of

HB 3475 3
the number of registered voters of the county voting in the last gubernatorial election, calling
for an election to repeal such tax, the governing body shall submit to the voters a proposal to
repeal the tax. If a majority of the votes cast on the question by the qualified voters voting
thereon are in favor of the repeal, the repeal shall become effective on December thirty-first
of the calendar year in which such repeal was approved. If a majority of the votes cast on the
question by the qualified voters voting thereon are opposed to the repeal, such tax shall
remain effective until the question is resubmitted under this section to the qualified voters and
the repeal is approved by a majority of the qualified voters voting on the question.
[8.] 9. If such tax is repealed or terminated by any means, all moneys remaining in the
special trust fund shall continue to be used solely for the designated purposes. The county
shall notify the director of the department of revenue of the repeal or termination at least
ninety days before the effective date of the repeal or termination. The director may order
retention in the trust fund, for a period of one year, of two percent of the amount collected
after receipt of such notice to cover possible refunds or overpayments of the tax and to
redeem dishonored checks and drafts deposited to the credit of such account. After one year
has elapsed after the effective date of the repeal or termination, the director shall remit the
balance in the account to the county and close the account of that county. The director shall
notify such county of each instance of any amount refunded or any check redeemed from
receipts due the county.
✔